Oklahoma, session 2025, SB285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2357.206, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 49, O.S.L. 2022 (68 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 2357.206), is amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 1268 Page 1


Section 2357.206. A. This act shall be known and may be cited


as the “Oklahoma Equal Opportunity Education Scholarship Act”.


B. 1. Except as provided in subsection G H of this section,


after August 26, 2011, there shall be allowed a credit for any


taxpayer who makes a contribution to an eligible scholarship-


granting organization.


The credit shall be equal to fifty percent (50%) of the total


amount of contributions made during a taxable year, not to exceed


One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for single individuals, Two


Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) for married individuals filing jointly,


or One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) for any taxpayer which


is a legal business entity including limited and general


partnerships, corporations, subchapter S corporations and limited


liability companies, plus any suspended credits pursuant to


subparagraph d e of paragraph 2 of subsection I J of this section;


provided, if total credits claimed pursuant to this paragraph exceed


the cap amount established pursuant to paragraphs 1 and 2 of


subsection E F of this section, the credit shall be equal to the


taxpayer’s proportionate share of the cap for the taxable year, as


determined pursuant to subsection I J of this section.


2. For any taxpayer who makes a contribution to an eligible


scholarship-granting organization and makes a written commitment to


contribute the same amount for an additional year, the credit for


the first year and the additional year shall be equal to seventy-

Req. No. 1268 Page 2


five percent (75%) of the total amount of the contribution made


during a taxable year, not to exceed the amounts established in


paragraph 1 of this subsection for the taxable year in which the


credit provided in this subsection is claimed. The taxpayer shall


provide evidence of the written commitment to the Oklahoma Tax


Commission at the time of filing the refund claim.


3. The credits authorized pursuant to the provisions of this


subsection shall be allocable to the partners, shareholders,


members, or other equity owners of a taxpayer that is authorized to


be treated as a partnership for purposes of federal income tax


reporting for the taxable year for which the tax credits authorized


by this subsection are claimed on the applicable return, together


with required schedules, forms or reports of the partners,


shareholders, members, or other equity owners of the taxpayer. Tax


credits which are allocated to such equity owners shall only be


limited in amount for the income tax return of a natural person or


persons based upon the limitation of the total credit amount to the


entity from which the tax credits have been allocated and shall not


be limited to One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for single


individuals or limited to Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) for


married persons filing a joint return.


4. On or before April 30, 2024, and once every two (2) years


thereafter, such scholarship-granting organization and educational


improvement grant organization shall electronically submit to the

Req. No. 1268 Page 3


Oklahoma Tax Commission, the Governor, President Pro Tempore of the


Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the chairs


chair and vice chairs chair of the education committees of the


Senate and House of Representatives Education Committee of the


Senate, the Common Education Committee of the House of


Representatives, and the Higher Education and Career Tech Committee


of the House of Representatives an audited financial statement for


the organization along with information detailing the benefits,


successes, or failures of the program, and make publicly available


on its website the financial statement and information submitted


pursuant to this paragraph.


C. 1. Except as provided in subsection G H of this section,


after August 26, 2011, there shall be allowed a credit for any


taxpayer who makes a contribution to an eligible educational


improvement grant organization. Except as otherwise provided by


paragraph 2 of this subsection, the credit shall be equal to fifty


percent (50%) of the total amount of contributions made during a


taxable year, not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for


single individuals, Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) for married


individuals filing jointly, or One Hundred Thousand Dollars


($100,000.00) for any taxpayer which is a legal business entity


including limited and general partnerships, corporations, subchapter


S corporations, and limited liability companies, plus any suspended


credits pursuant to subparagraph d e of paragraph 2 of subsection I

Req. No. 1268 Page 4


J of this section; provided, if total credits claimed pursuant to


this paragraph exceed the cap amount established pursuant to


paragraphs 3 and 4 of subsection E F of this section, the credit


shall be equal to the taxpayer’s proportionate share of the cap for


the taxable year, as determined pursuant to subsection I J of this


section.


2. For any taxpayer who makes a contribution to an eligible


educational improvement grant organization and makes a written


commitment to contribute the same amount for an additional year, the


credit for the first year and the additional year shall be equal to


seventy-five percent (75%) of the total amount of the contribution


made during a taxable year, not to exceed the cap amount established


in paragraphs 3 and 4 of subsection E F of this section for the


taxable year in which the credit provided in this paragraph is


claimed; provided, if total credits claimed pursuant to this


paragraph exceed the cap established pursuant to paragraphs 3 and 4


of subsection E F of this section, the credit shall be equal to the


taxpayer’s proportionate share of the cap for the taxable year, as


determined pursuant to subsection I J of this section. The taxpayer


shall provide evidence of the written commitment to the Oklahoma Tax


Commission at the time of filing the refund claim.


3. The credits authorized pursuant to the provisions of this


subsection shall be allocable to the partners, shareholders,


members, or other equity owners of a taxpayer that is authorized to

Req. No. 1268 Page 5


be treated as a partnership for purposes of federal income tax


reporting for the taxable year for which the tax credits authorized


by this subsection are claimed on the applicable return, together


with required schedules, forms, or reports of the partners,


shareholders, members, or other equity owners of the taxpayer. Tax


credits which are allocated to such equity owners shall only be


limited in amount for the income tax return of a natural person or


persons based upon the limitation of the total credit amount to the


entity from which the tax credits have been allocated and shall not


be limited to One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for single


individuals or limited to Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) for


married persons filing a joint return.


D. 1. For contributions made on or after January 1, 2022,


there shall be allowed a credit for any taxpayer who makes a


contribution to an eligible public school foundation or public


school district. Except as otherwise provided by paragraph 2 of


this subsection, the credit shall be equal to fifty percent (50%) of


the total amount of contributions made during a taxable year, not to


exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for single individuals, Two


Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) for married individuals filing jointly,


or One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) for any taxpayer which


is a legal business entity including limited and general


partnerships, corporations, subchapter S corporations, and limited


liability companies; provided, if total credits claimed pursuant to

Req. No. 1268 Page 6


this paragraph exceed the cap amount established pursuant to


paragraph 4 of subsection E F of this section, the credit shall be


equal to the taxpayer’s proportionate share of the cap for the


taxable year, as determined pursuant to subsection I J of this


section.


2. Except as otherwise provided by paragraph 1 of this


subsection, for any taxpayer who makes a contribution to an eligible


public school foundation or public school district and makes a


written commitment to contribute the same amount for an additional


year, the credit for the first year and the additional year shall be


equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of the total amount of the


contribution made during a taxable year, not to exceed the cap


amount established in paragraph 4 of subsection E F of this section


for the taxable year in which the credit provided in this paragraph


is claimed. The taxpayer shall provide evidence of the written


commitment to the Oklahoma Tax Commission at the time of filing the


refund claim; provided, if total credits claimed pursuant to this


paragraph exceed the cap amount established pursuant to paragraph 4


of subsection E F of this section, the credit shall be equal to the


taxpayer’s proportionate share of the cap for the taxable year, as


determined pursuant to subsection I J of this section.


3. The credits authorized pursuant to the provisions of this


subsection shall be allocable to the partners, shareholders,


members, or other equity owners of a taxpayer that is authorized to

Req. No. 1268 Page 7


be treated as a partnership for purposes of federal income tax


reporting for the taxable year for which the tax credits authorized


by this subsection are claimed on the applicable return, together


with required schedules, forms, or reports of the partners,


shareholders, members, or other equity owners of the taxpayer. Tax


credits which are allocated to such equity owners shall only be


limited in amount for the income tax return of a natural person or


persons based upon the limitation of the total credit amount to the


entity from which the tax credits have been allocated and shall not


be limited to One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for single


individuals or limited to Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) for


married persons filing a joint return.


4. On or before April 30, 2024, and once every four (4) years


thereafter, such eligible public school foundation and public school


district shall submit to the Oklahoma Tax Commission, the Governor,


President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of


Representatives an audited financial statement for the organization


along with information detailing the benefits, successes, or


failures of the programs.


E. 1. For contributions made on or after January 1, 2025,


there shall be allowed a credit for any taxpayer who makes a


contribution to an eligible higher education institution foundation.


Except as otherwise provided by paragraph 2 of this subsection, the


credit shall be equal to fifty percent (50%) of the total amount of

Req. No. 1268 Page 8


contributions made during a taxable year, not to exceed One Thousand


Dollars ($1,000.00) for single individuals, Two Thousand Dollars


($2,000.00) for married individuals filing jointly, or One Hundred


Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) for any taxpayer which is a legal


business entity including limited and general partnerships,


corporations, subchapter S corporations, and limited liability


companies; provided, if total credits claimed pursuant to this


paragraph exceed the cap amount established pursuant to paragraph 5


of subsection F of this section, the credit shall be equal to the


taxpayer’s proportionate share of the cap for the taxable year, as


determined pursuant to subsection J of this section.


2. Except as otherwise provided by paragraph 1 of this


subsection, for any taxpayer who makes a contribution to an eligible


higher education institution foundation and makes a written


commitment to contribute the same amount for an additional year, the


credit for the first year and the additional year shall be equal to


seventy-five percent (75%) of the total amount of the contribution


made during a taxable year, not to exceed the cap amount established


in paragraph 5 of subsection F of this section for the tax year in


which the credit provided in this paragraph is claimed. The


taxpayer shall provide evidence of the written commitment to the


Oklahoma Tax Commission at the time of filing the refund claim;


provided, if total credits claimed pursuant to this paragraph exceed


the cap amount established pursuant to paragraph 5 of subsection F

Req. No. 1268 Page 9


of this section, the credit shall be equal to the proportionate


share of the cap for the taxable year, as determined pursuant to


subsection J of this section.


3. The credits authorized pursuant to the provisions of this


subsection shall be allocable to the partners, shareholders,


members, or other equity owners of a taxpayer that is authorized to


be treated as a partnership for purposes of federal income tax


reporting for the taxable year for which the tax credits authorized


by this subsection are claimed on the applicable return, together


with required schedules, forms, or reports of the partners,


shareholders, members, or other equity owners of the taxpayer. Tax


credits which are allocated to the equity owners shall be limited


only in the amount for the income tax return of a natural person or


persons based upon the limitation of the total credit amount to the


entity from which the tax credits have been allocated and shall not


be subject to the limitations for single filers or married persons


filing a joint return as provided in paragraph 1 of this subsection.


4. On or before April 30, 2027, and once every four (4) years


thereafter, each eligible higher education institution foundation


shall submit to the Oklahoma Tax Commission, the Governor, the


President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of


Representatives an audited financial statement for the foundation


along with information detailing the benefits, successes, or


failures of the program.

Req. No. 1268 Page 10


F. Except as otherwise provided pursuant to subsection I J of


this section:


1. The total credits authorized pursuant to subsection B of


this section for all taxpayers for tax years 2017 through 2021 shall


not exceed Three Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars


($3,500,000.00) annually;


2. The total credits authorized pursuant to subsection B of


this section for all taxpayers for tax years year 2022 and


subsequent tax years shall not exceed Twenty-five Million Dollars


($25,000,000.00) annually;


3. The total credits authorized pursuant to subsection C of


this section for all taxpayers for tax years 2017 through 2021 shall


not exceed One Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00)


annually;


4. The total credits authorized pursuant to subsections C and D


of this section for all taxpayers for tax year 2022 and subsequent


tax years shall not exceed Twenty-five Million Dollars


($25,000,000.00) annually. In Except as otherwise provided pursuant


to subparagraph c of paragraph 2 of subsection J of this section, in


addition to the cap amount prescribed by this paragraph, the credit


amount shall also be limited to Two Hundred Thousand Dollars


($200,000.00) of credits per public school district annually; and


5. The total credits authorized pursuant to subsection E of


this section for all taxpayers for tax year 2025 and subsequent tax

Req. No. 1268 Page 11


years shall not exceed Twenty-five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00)


annually. Except as otherwise provided pursuant to subparagraph d


of paragraph 2 of subsection J of this section, in addition to the


cap amount prescribed by this paragraph, the credit amount shall


also be limited to Seven Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars


($7,500,000.00) of credits per public higher education institution


annually; and


6. The cap on total credits provided for in this subsection


shall be allocated by the Tax Commission as provided in subsection I


J of this section.


F. G. For credits claimed for eligible contributions made


during tax year 2014 and thereafter, a credit shall not be allowed


by the Oklahoma Tax Commission for contributions made to a


scholarship-granting organization or an educational improvement


grant organization if that organization’s percentage of funds


actually awarded is less than ninety percent (90%). For purposes of


this section, the “percentage of funds actually awarded” shall be


determined by dividing the total amount of funds actually awarded as


educational scholarships or educational improvement grants over the


most recent twenty-four (24) months by the total amount available to


award as educational scholarships or educational improvement grants


over the most recent twenty-four (24) months.


G. H. Any tax credits which are earned by a taxpayer pursuant


to this section during the time period beginning August 26, 2011,

Req. No. 1268 Page 12


through December 31, 2012, may not be claimed for any period prior


to the taxable year beginning January 1, 2013. No credits which


accrue during the time period beginning August 26, 2011, through


December 31, 2012, may be used to file an amended tax return for any


taxable year prior to the taxable year beginning January 1, 2013.


H. I. As used in this section:


1. “Eligible student” means a child of school age who is


lawfully present in the United States and who is a member of a


household in which the total annual income during the preceding tax


year does not exceed an amount equal to three hundred percent (300%)


of the income standard used to qualify for a free or reduced-price


school lunch or who, during the immediately preceding school year,


attended or, by virtue of the location of such student’s place of


residence, was eligible to attend a public school in this state


which has been identified for school improvement as determined by


the State Board of Education pursuant to the requirements of the No


Child Left Behind Act of 2001, P.L. No. 107-110. Once a student has


received an educational scholarship, as defined in paragraph 3 of


this subsection, the student and any siblings who are members of the


same household shall remain eligible until they graduate from high


school or reach twenty-one (21) years of age, whichever occurs


first;


2. “Eligible special needs student” means a child who has been


provided services under an Individualized Family Service Plan

Req. No. 1268 Page 13


individualized family service plan through the SoonerStart program


and during transition was evaluated and determined to be eligible


for school district services, a child of school age who has attended


public school in our state with an individualized education program


pursuant to the Individuals With Disabilities Education Act, 20


U.S.C.A., Section 1400 et seq., or a child who has been diagnosed by


a clinical professional as having a significant disability that will


affect learning and who has been approved by the board of a


scholarship-granting organization;


3. “Educational scholarships” means:


a. scholarships to an eligible student of up to Five


Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or eighty percent (80%)


of the statewide annual average per-pupil expenditure


as determined by the National Center for Education


Statistics, U.S. Department of Education, whichever is


greater, to cover all or part of the tuition, fees,


and transportation costs of a qualified school which


is accredited by the State Board of Education or an


accrediting association approved by the Board pursuant


to Section 3-104 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


b. scholarships to an eligible student of up to Five


Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or eighty percent (80%)


of the statewide annual average per-pupil expenditure


as determined by the National Center for Education

Req. No. 1268 Page 14


Statistics, U.S. Department of Education, whichever is


greater, to cover the educational costs of a qualified


school which does not charge tuition, which enrolls


special populations of students, and which is


accredited by the State Board of Education or an


accrediting association approved by the Board pursuant


to Section 3-104 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


or


c. scholarships to an eligible special needs student of


up to Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) to


cover all or part of the tuition, fees, and


transportation costs of a qualified school for


eligible special needs students which is accredited by


the State Board of Education or an accrediting


association approved by the Board pursuant to Section


3-104 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or


d. scholarships to an eligible public higher education


institution student to cover all or part of the


tuition and fees for undergraduate courses at an


institution authorized by the Oklahoma State Regents


for Higher Education;


4. “Low-income eligible student” means an eligible student or


eligible special needs student who qualifies for a free or reduced-


price lunch;

Req. No. 1268 Page 15


5. “Qualified school” means an early childhood, elementary, or


secondary private school in this state including schools which


provide special educational programs for three-year-olds or


prekindergarten educational programs for four-year-olds, which:


a. is accredited by the State Board of Education or an


accrediting association approved by the Board pursuant


to Section 3-104 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


b. is in compliance with all applicable health and safety


laws and codes,


c. has a stated policy against discrimination in


admissions on the basis of race, color, national


origin, or disability, and


d. ensures academic accountability to parents and


guardians of students through regular progress


reports;


6. “Qualified school for eligible special needs students” means


an early childhood, elementary, or secondary private school in a


county in this state including schools which provide special


educational programs for three-year-olds or prekindergarten


educational programs for four-year-olds;


7. “Scholarship-granting organization” means an organization


which:





Req. No. 1268 Page 16


a. is a nonprofit entity exempt from taxation pursuant to


the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,


as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3),


b. distributes periodic scholarship payments as checks


made out to an eligible student’s or eligible special


needs student’s parent or guardian and mailed to the


qualified school where the student is enrolled,


c. spends no more than ten percent (10%) of its annual


revenue on expenditures other than educational


scholarships as defined in paragraph 3 of this


subsection,


d. spends each year a portion of its expenditures on


educational scholarships for low-income eligible


students, as defined in paragraph 4 of this


subsection, in an amount equal to or greater than the


percentage of low-income eligible students in the


state,


e. ensures that scholarships are portable during the


school year and can be used at any qualified school


that accepts the eligible student or at any qualified


school for special needs students that accepts the


eligible special needs student,


f. registers with the Oklahoma Tax Commission as a


scholarship-granting organization, and

Req. No. 1268 Page 17


g. has policies in place to:


(1) carry out criminal background checks on all


employees and board members to ensure that no


individual is involved with the organization who


might reasonably pose a risk to the appropriate


use of contributed funds, and


(2) maintain full and accurate records with respect


to the receipt of contributions and expenditures


of those contributions and supply such records


and any other documentation required by the Tax


Commission to demonstrate financial


accountability;


8. “Annual revenue” means the total amount or value of


contributions received by an organization from taxpayers awarded


credits during the organization’s fiscal year and all amounts earned


from interest or investments;


9. “Public school” means public schools as defined in Section


1-106 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


10. “Eligible public school district” means any public school;


11. “Early childhood education program” means a special


educational program for eligible special needs students who are


three (3) years of age or a prekindergarten educational program


provided to children who are at least four (4) years of age but not


more than five (5) years of age on or before September 1;

Req. No. 1268 Page 18


12. “Innovative educational program” means an advanced academic


or academic improvement program that is not part of the regular


coursework of a public school but that enhances the curriculum or


academic program of the school or provides early childhood education


programs to students;


13. “Educational improvement grant” means a grant to an


eligible public school to implement an innovative educational


program for students including the ability for multiple public


schools to make an application and be awarded a grant to jointly


provide an innovative educational program;


14. “Educational improvement grant organization” means an


organization which:


a. is a nonprofit entity exempt from taxation pursuant to


the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,


as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), and


b. contributes at least ninety percent (90%) of its


annual receipts as grants to eligible schools for


innovative educational programs. For purposes of this


subparagraph, an educational improvement grant


organization contributes its annual cash receipts when


it expends or otherwise irrevocably encumbers those


funds for expenditure during the then current fiscal


year of the organization or during the next succeeding


fiscal year of the organization; and

Req. No. 1268 Page 19


15. “Eligible public school foundation” means a nonprofit


entity formed pursuant to the laws of this state and is exempt from


federal income taxation pursuant to either Section 501(c)(3) or


Section 509(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.


Each public school foundation must shall be approved by the local


board of education prior to accepting qualifying donations;


16. “Eligible public higher education institution student”


means a student who is enrolled in a public higher education


institution in the state, who is lawfully present in the United


States, and who is a member of a household in which the total annual


income during the preceding tax year does not exceed an amount equal


to three hundred percent (300%) of the income standard used to


qualify for a free or reduced-price school lunch; and


17. “Eligible higher education institution foundation” means a


nonprofit entity formed pursuant to the laws of this state that is


exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to either Section


501(c)(3) or Section 509(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, and is formed for the primary purpose of supporting a


public higher education institution. Each public higher education


institution foundation shall be approved by the governing board of


the higher education institution prior to accepting qualifying


donations.


I. J. Total credits authorized by this section shall be


allocated as follows:

Req. No. 1268 Page 20


1. By January 10 of the year immediately following each


calendar year, a scholarship-granting organization, an educational


improvement grant organization, an eligible public school


foundation, or a public school district, or an eligible higher


education institution foundation which accepts contributions


pursuant to this section shall provide electronically to the Tax


Commission information on each contribution accepted during such


taxable year. At least once each taxable year, the entity making


the report shall notify each contributor that Oklahoma law provides


for a total, statewide cap on the amount of income tax credits


allowed annually;


2. a. If the Tax Commission determines the total combined


credits claimed for contributions made to scholarship-


granting organizations during the most recently


completed calendar year by all taxpayers are in excess


of the statewide cap amount provided in paragraphs 1


and 2 of subsection E F of this section, the Tax


Commission shall first allocate any amount of credits


not claimed for contributions made to organizations


authorized pursuant to subsections C and, D, and E of


this section, then shall determine the percentage of


the contribution which establishes the proportionate


share of the credit which may be claimed by any



Req. No. 1268 Page 21


taxpayer so that the total maximum credits authorized


by this section are not exceeded.


b. If the Tax Commission determines the total combined


credits claimed for contributions made to


organizations authorized pursuant to subsections C


and, D, and E of this section during the most recently


completed calendar year by all taxpayers are in excess


of the statewide cap amount provided in paragraphs 3


and, 4, and 5 of subsection E F of this section, the


Tax Commission shall first allocate any amount of


credits not claimed for contributions made to


scholarship-granting organizations, then shall


determine the percentage of the contribution which


establishes the proportionate share of the credit


which may be claimed by any taxpayer so that the


maximum credits authorized by this section are not


exceeded.


c. If the Tax Commission determines the total combined


credits claimed for contributions made to


organizations authorized pursuant to subsections C and


D of this section during the most recently completed


calendar year by all taxpayers are in excess of the


per public school district cap pursuant to paragraph 4


of subsection E F of this section, the Tax Commission

Req. No. 1268 Page 22


shall first allocate any amount of credits not claimed


for contributions made to other organizations


authorized pursuant to subsections C and D of this


section, then shall determine the percentage of the


contribution which establishes the proportionate share


of the credit which may be claimed by any taxpayer so


that the maximum credits authorized by this section


are not exceeded.


d. If the Tax Commission determines the total combined


credits claimed for contributions made to


organizations authorized pursuant to subsection E of


this section during the most recently completed


calendar year by all taxpayers are in excess of the


per higher education institution cap provided in


paragraph 5 of subsection F of this section, the Tax


Commission shall first allocate any amount of credits


not claimed for contributions made to other


organizations authorized pursuant to subsection E of


this section, then shall determine the percentage of


the contribution which establishes the proportionate


share of the credit which may be claimed by any


taxpayer so that the maximum credits authorized by


this section are not exceeded.



Req. No. 1268 Page 23


e. Beginning for tax year 2016, credits earned, but not


allowed due to the application of statewide caps


provided in subsection E F of this section will be


considered suspended and authorized to be used in the


next immediate tax year and applied to the next year’s


statewide cap; and


3. The Tax Commission shall publish the percentage of the


contribution which may be claimed as a credit by contributors for


the most recently completed calendar year on the Tax Commission


website no later than February 15 of each calendar year for


contributions made the previous year. Each organization authorized


pursuant to subsections B, C, and D, and E of this section shall


notify contributors of that amount annually.


J. K. No tax credits authorized by this section shall be used


to reduce the tax liability of the taxpayer to less than zero (0).


K. L. Any credits authorized by this section allowed but not


used in any tax year may be carried over, in order, to each of the


three (3) years following the year of qualification.


L. M. 1. In order to qualify under this section, each


organization authorized pursuant to subsections C and, D, and E of


this section shall submit an application with information to the


Oklahoma Tax Commission on a form prescribed by the Tax Commission


that:



Req. No. 1268 Page 24


a. enables the Tax Commission to confirm that the


organization is a nonprofit entity exempt from


taxation pursuant to the provisions of the Internal


Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section


501(c)(3) or Section 509(a), and


b. describes the proposed innovative educational program


or programs supported by the organization.


2. The Tax Commission shall review and approve or disapprove


the application, in consultation with the State Department of


Education or the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education.


3. In order to maintain eligibility under this section, an


organization authorized pursuant to subsections C and D of this


section shall annually report the following information to the Tax


Commission and publish on its website by September 1 of each year:


a. the name of the innovative educational program or


programs and the total amount of the grant or grants


made to those programs during the immediately


preceding school year,


b. a description of how each grant was utilized during


the immediately preceding school year and a


description of any demonstrated or expected innovative


educational improvements,


c. the names of the public school and school districts


where innovative educational programs that received

Req. No. 1268 Page 25


grants during the immediately preceding school year


were implemented,


d. where the organization collects information on a


county-by-county basis, and


e. the total number and total amount of grants made


during the immediately preceding school year for


innovative educational programs at public school by


each county in which the organization made grants.


4. In order to maintain eligibility under this section, an


organization authorized pursuant to subsection E of this section


shall annually report the following information to the Tax


Commission and publish on its website by September 1 of each year:


a. the name of the higher education institution


scholarship program or programs and the total amount


of funds distributed by the foundation through those


programs during the immediately preceding school year,


b. a description of how the scholarship funds were


utilized during the immediately preceding school year,


and


c. the total number and total amount of scholarships


granted during the immediately preceding school year.


5. The information required under paragraph paragraphs 3 and 4


of this subsection shall be submitted on a form provided by the Tax


Commission. No later than May 1 of each year, the Tax Commission

Req. No. 1268 Page 26


shall annually distribute sample forms together with the forms on


which the reports are required to be made to each approved


organization.


5. 6. The Tax Commission shall not require any other


information be provided by an organization, except as expressly


authorized in this section.


M. N. 1. Beginning in 2023 for the 2022-2023 academic year, in


order to maintain registration, a scholarship-granting organization


shall annually report to the Tax Commission by September 1 of each


year the following information regarding the educational


scholarships funded by the organization in the previous academic


year:


a. the name and address of the scholarship-granting


organization,


b. the names of the qualifying schools that received


funding for educational scholarships, the total amount


of funds paid to each qualifying school, and the total


number of scholarship recipients enrolled in each


qualifying school,


c. the total number and total dollar amount of


contributions received during the previous academic


year,





Req. No. 1268 Page 27


d. the total number and total dollar amount of


educational scholarships awarded and funded during the


previous academic year,


e. the total number, total dollar amount, and percentage


of educational scholarships awarded and funded during


the previous academic year disaggregated into the


following categories:


(1) low-income eligible students,


(2) students who during the immediately preceding


school year attended or who were eligible by


virtue of the residence of the student to attend


a public school in the state which was identified


for school improvement by the State Board of


Education,


(3) eligible special needs students, and


(4) students who were first-time recipients of a


scholarship including information about the type


of public or private school the student was


enrolled in during the entire previous academic


year,


f. the percentage of annual revenue received by the


organization from donations which qualify for tax


credits pursuant to this section which was not


expended on scholarships,

Req. No. 1268 Page 28


g. disaggregated data reported under this subsection


shall be redacted if reporting would allow for


identification of specific children, and shall be


reported in accordance with the Student Data


Accessibility, Transparency and Accountability Act of


2013, division subparagraph b of subparagraph


paragraph 2 of subsection C of Section 3-168 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes, and the Family


Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (FERPA), 20


U.S.C., Section 1232g, and


h. the percentage of the total amount of education


scholarship expenditures spent on low-income eligible


students.


2. The Tax Commission shall make available on its website:


a. the information submitted by the scholarship-granting


organization pursuant to paragraph 1 of this


subsection,


b. a list of participating schools, and


c. all other application information submitted to the Tax


Commission by a scholarship-granting organization,


except that information which would violate the


privacy of an individual.


3. A scholarship-granting organization shall annually submit


verification to the Tax Commission that the organization still meets

Req. No. 1268 Page 29


the criteria set forth in paragraph 7 of subsection H I of this


section.


N. O. Contributions made pursuant to subsections B, C, and D of


this section shall not be used by the Legislature to reduce the


amount appropriated for the financial support of public schools.


O. P. In consultation with the State Department of Education


and the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, the Tax


Commission shall promulgate rules necessary to implement the


Oklahoma Equal Opportunity Education Scholarship Act. The rules


shall include procedures for the registration of a scholarship-


granting organization, an educational improvement grant


organization, a public school foundation, or a public school


district, or a public higher education institution foundation for


purposes of determining if the organization meets the requirements


of the Oklahoma Equal Opportunity Education Scholarship Act or for


the revocation of the registration of an organization, if


applicable, and for notice as required in subsection I J of this


section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1268 QD 12/30/2024 11:14:39 PM







Req. No. 1268 Page 30